Maryland, session 2026, SB0061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–206.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Cannabis Regulation and Enforcement
Fund.
(b) There is a Cannabis Regulation and Enforcement Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide funds to cover the costs of:
(1) the operation of the Administration;
(2) administering and enforcing this title; [and]
(3) supporting the Social Equity Partnership Grant Program established
under § 1–323 of this article; AND
(4) SUPPORTING THE RELEASE PREPARATION PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–619 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
(d) The Administration shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) fees distributed to the Fund under § 36–205 of this subtitle;
(2) revenue distributed to the Fund under § 2–1302.2 of the Tax – General
Article;

SENATE BILL 61 3
(3) interest earnings of the Fund; and
(4) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund, in accordance with any conditions adopted by the Commission for the acceptance of
donations or gifts to the Fund.
(g) The Fund may be used for:
(1) carrying out this title [and];
(2) supporting the Social Equity Partnership Grant Program established
under § 1–323 of this article; AND
(3) SUPPORTING THE RELEASE PREPARATION PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–619 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) The Fund is subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits as provided for
in § 2–1220 of the State Government Article.
(j) (1) On or before March 15 each year, the Administration shall publish on
its website a detailed report on revenue distributed to and expenditures from the Fund.
(2) The report shall also be submitted to the General Assembly in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
Article – Correctional Services
9–619.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE RELEASE PREPARATION
VOLUNTEER SERVICES PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A RELEASE PREPARATION VOLUNTEER SERVICES PROGRAM
IN THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION.
(C) (1) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION SHALL ESTABLISH A PROTOCOL
FOR REGISTERING VOLUNTEERS, INCLUDING FORMERLY INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS AND ORGANIZATIONS LED BY FORMERLY INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS, IN THE PROGRAM TO HAVE ACCESS TO STATE CORRECTIONAL

SENATE BILL 61
FACILITIES FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSISTING INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WITH
RELEASE PREPARATION.
(2) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION SHALL SUBMIT THE PROTOCOL
ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR APPROVAL.
(D) THE PROTOCOL ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL REQUIRE:
(1) THE REGISTRATION OF FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS
VOLUNTEERS IN THE PROGRAM TO BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC
MAINTAINED BY THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION TO MAINTAIN A RECORD OF
VOLUNTEERS REGISTERED IN THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) A FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IN THE PROGRAM TO
DECIDE WHETHER:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S NAME IS MADE AVAILABLE TO THE
PUBLIC; OR
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, ANOTHER
VOLUNTEER OR AN ORGANIZATION WILL PROVIDE THAT VOLUNTEER’S NAME OR
THE NAME OF THE ORGANIZATION ON BEHALF OF THE FORMERLY INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE REGISTRATION OF
VOLUNTEERS IN THE PROGRAM TO BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC; AND
(3) A VOLUNTEER IN THE PROGRAM TO PROVIDE TO THE DIVISION OF
CORRECTION A WRITTEN SCHEDULE DESCRIBING WHEN THE INDIVIDUAL
VOLUNTEER INTENDS TO ACCESS A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(E) A VOLUNTEER IN THE PROGRAM:
(1) HAS THE RIGHT TO ELECT WHETHER THE VOLUNTEER’S NAME IS
MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC; AND
(2) MUST CONSENT IN WRITING IF THE VOLUNTEER ELECTS THE
DISCLOSURE OF THE VOLUNTEER’S NAME TO THE PUBLIC.
(F) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION MAY NOT DENY A SCHEDULE PROVIDED
UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2) (D)(3) OF THIS SECTION UNLESS THE SCHEDULE
INTERFERES WITH THE NORMAL FUNCTION OF THE STATE CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY.

SENATE BILL 61 5
(F) (1) IF A FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL DOES NOT WANT THE
FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S NAME MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC,
ANOTHER VOLUNTEER OR AN ORGANIZATION MAY PROVIDE THAT VOLUNTEER’S
NAME OR THE NAME OF THE ORGANIZATION ON BEHALF OF THE FORMERLY
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL.
(2) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION SHALL MAINTAIN A RECORD OF
THE NAMES OF FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE ANOTHER
VOLUNTEER OR AN ORGANIZATION PROVIDE THEIR NAME FOR PURPOSES OF
SUBSECTION (D)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.